District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.56

Policies and procedures.

The Mayor, pursuant to § 4-756.02 and in consultation with the Interagency Council, shall set forth the policies and procedures for inspections, procedures for identifying and curing deficiencies, and procedures for taking enforcement actions against providers in violation of the standards of this chapter. The policies and procedures may include criteria for the provision of performance-based bonuses or penalties for providers.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 27f
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(i), 54 DCR 1097